Utah statutes.
53B-17-201.   Proceeds from federal land grants for a Miners' Hospital -- Reporting requirements.

(1)  There is appropriated to the University of Utah all funds, assets, and revenues which have been, or will be, derived from the sale or other disposition of those lands conveyed to the state of Utah by those federal grants for a Miners' Hospital for Disabled Miners contained in Section 12 of the Enabling Act and in Chapter 280, Public Laws of the Seventieth Congress, 2nd Session (Act of February 20, 1929) which funds, assets, and revenues now are, or in the future will be, in the custody and control of the School and Institutional Trust Lands Board of Trustees.

(2)  The University of Utah shall report annually to the Legislature's Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environmental Quality Appropriations Subcommittee the following information regarding the appropriation described in Subsection (1):

(a)  an accounting of the use of the previous year's appropriation; and

(b)  a plan for how the University of Utah will use future appropriations.

